pt-BR: Área de cobertura das proteções: Abdômen; Parte inferior do corpo completa; Glúteos; Virilha; Quadris; Joelhos; Lombar; Quadríceps; Coluna; Cóccix; Coxas; Outro
el: Περιοχή κάλυψης μαξιλαριού: Κοιλιακή χώρα; Ολόκληρο κάτω μέρος του σώματος; Γλουτοί; Βουβωνική χώρα; Γοφοί; Γόνατα; Μέση; Τετρακέφαλοι; Σπονδυλική στήλη; Κόκκυγας; Μηροί; Άλλο
da: Dækningsområde for pudder: Mave; Hele underkroppen; Balder; Lyske; Hofter; Knæ; Lænd; Forlår; Rygsøjle; Haleben; Lår; Andet
ko: 패드 보호 영역: 복부; 하체 전체; 둔근; 사타구니; 고관절; 무릎; 허리; 대퇴사두근; 척추; 꼬리뼈; 허벅지; 기타
fr: Zones protégées: Abdomen; Bas du corps complet; Fessiers; Aine; Hanches; Genoux; Bas du dos; Quadriceps; Colonne vertébrale; Coccyx; Cuisses; Autre
ru: Зона покрытия защиты: Живот; Вся нижняя часть тела; Ягодицы; Пах; Таз; Колени; Поясница; Квадрицепсы; Позвоночник; Копчик; Бедра; Другое
lt-LT: Apsaugos padengimo sritis: Pilvas; Visa apatinė kūno dalis; Sėdmenys; Kirkšnys; Klubai; Keliai; Apatinė nugaros dalis; Keturgalviai raumenys; Stuburas; Uodegikaulis; Šlaunys; Kita
sl-SI: Območje pokritosti ploščic: Trebuh; Celoten spodnji del telesa; Zadnjične mišice; Dimlje; Boki; Kolena; Spodnji del hrbta; Kvadricepsi; Hrbtenica; Trtica; Stegna; Drugo
vi: Khu vực phủ sóng của tấm đệm: Bụng; Toàn bộ thân dưới; Cơ mông; Háng; Hông; Đầu gối; Lưng dưới; Cơ đùi trước; Cột sống; Xương cụt; Đùi; Khác
sk-SK: Oblasť pokrytia chrániča: Brucho; Celá dolná časť tela; Sedacie svaly; Slabiny; Bedrá; Kolená; Kríže; Kvadricapsy; Chrbtica; Kostrč; Stehná; Iné
ja: パッドカバーエリア: 腹部; 下半身全体; 臀部; 股間; ヒップ; 膝; 腰; 大腿四頭筋; 脊椎; 尾骨; 太もも; その他
zh-TW: 護墊覆蓋部位: 腹部; 全下半身; 臀部; 鼠蹊部; 髖部; 膝蓋; 下背部; 股四頭肌; 脊椎; 尾骨; 大腿; 其他
hu: Párnázott védőfelület: Has; Teljes alsótest; Farizmok; Ágyék; Csípő; Térd; Derék; Combfeszítő; Gerinc; Farokcsont; Comb; Egyéb
zh-CN: 打击垫覆盖区域: 腹部; 全下半身; 臀部; 腹股沟; 髋部; 膝部; 下背部; 股四头肌; 脊柱; 尾骨; 大腿; 其他
fi: Suojuksen peittoalue: Vatsa; Koko alavartalo; Pakarat; Nivuset; Lonkat; Polvet; Alaselkä; Etureidet; Selkäranka; Häntäluu; Reidet; Muu
it: Area di copertura del pad: Addome; Parte inferiore del corpo; Glutei; Inguine; Fianchi; Ginocchia; Zona lombare; Quadricipiti; Colonna vertebrale; Coccige; Cosce; Altro
cs: Oblast pokrytí chrániče: Břicho; Celá dolní část těla; Hýždě; Třísla; Boky; Kolena; Bedra; Kvadricepsy; Páteř; Kostrč; Stehna; Jiné
hr-HR: Područje pokrivenosti jastučića: Trbuh; Cijeli donji dio tijela; Gluteusi; Prepone; Bokovi; Koljena; Donji dio leđa; Kvadricepsi; Kralježnica; Trtica; Bedra; Ostalo
bg-BG: Зона на покритие на подложката: Корем; Цяла долна част на тялото; Седалище; Слабини; Ханш; Колене; Кръст; Квадрицепси; Гръбначен стълб; Опашна кост; Бедра; Друго
th: พื้นที่ครอบคลุมของแผ่นรอง: หน้าท้อง; ร่างกายส่วนล่างทั้งหมด; กล้ามเนื้อบั้นท้าย; ขาหนีบ; สะโพก; เข่า; หลังส่วนล่าง; กล้ามเนื้อต้นขาด้านหน้า; กระดูกสันหลัง; กระดูกก้นกบ; ต้นขา; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Zona de acoperire a pad-ului: Abdomen; Partea inferioară a corpului completă; Fesieri; Zona inghinală; Șolduri; Genunchi; Zona lombară; Cvadricepși; Coloană vertebrală; Coccis; Coapse; Altele
tr: Ped kapsama alanı: Karın; Tüm alt gövde; Kalça kasları; Kasık; Kalça; Dizler; Alt sırt; Üst ön bacak kasları; Omurga; Kuyruk sokumu; Uyluklar; Diğer
nl: Pad dekkingsgebied: Buik; Volledig onderlichaam; Bilspieren; Lies; Heupen; Knieën; Onderrug; Quadriceps; Wervelkolom; Stuitje; Dijen; Overig
pt-PT: Área de cobertura da almofada: Abdómen; Parte inferior do corpo completa; Glúteos; Virilha; Ancas; Joelhos; Lombar; Quadricípites; Coluna; Cóccix; Coxas; Outro
de: Abdeckungsbereich des Polsters: Bauch; Gesamter Unterkörper; Gesäß; Leiste; Hüften; Knie; Unterer Rücken; Quadrizeps; Wirbelsäule; Steißbein; Oberschenkel; Sonstige
pl: Obszar chroniony przez ochraniacze: Brzuch; Cała dolna część ciała; Pośladki; Pachwina; Biodra; Kolana; Dolna część pleców; Mięśnie czworogłowe uda; Kręgosłup; Kość ogonowa; Uda; Inne
es: Área de cobertura de las almohadillas: Abdomen; Parte inferior del cuerpo completa; Glúteos; Ingle; Caderas; Rodillas; Parte baja de la espalda; Cuádriceps; Columna vertebral; Cóccix; Muslos; Otro
nb: Dekningsområde for puten: Mage; Hele underkroppen; Setemuskulatur; Lysk; Hofter; Knær; Korsrygg; Lårmuskler; Ryggrad; Halebein; Lår; Annet
sv: Täckningsområde för dynan: Mage; Hela underkroppen; Sätesmuskler; Ljumskar; Höfter; Knän; Ländrygg; Framsida lår; Ryggrad; Svanskota; Lår; Övrigt
en: Pad coverage area: Abdomen; Full lower body; Glutes; Groin; Hips; Knees; Lower back; Quadriceps; Spine; Tailbone; Thighs; Other